Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-596.2.
Energy efficiency programs; financial assistance for low-income customers.

Notwithstanding subsection G of § 56-580, or any other provision of law, each incumbent investor-owned electric utility shall develop proposed energy efficiency programs. Any program shall provide for the submission of a petition or petitions for approval
to design, implement, and operate energy efficiency programs pursuant to subdivision A 5 c of § 56-585.1. At least 15 percent of such proposed costs of energy efficiency programs shall be allocated to programs designed to benefit
low-income, elderly, or disabled individuals or veterans.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each investor-owned incumbent electric utility shall implement energy efficiency programs and measures to achieve the following total annual energy savings:

For Phase I electric utilities:

In calendar year 2022, at least 0.5 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019;

In calendar year 2023, at least 1.0 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019;

In calendar year 2024, at least 1.5 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019; and

In calendar year 2025, at least 2.0 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019;

The projected costs for the utility to design, implement, and operate such energy efficiency programs and portfolios of programs shall be no less than an aggregate amount of $140 million for a Phase I Utility and $870 million for a Phase II Utility for
the period beginning July 1, 2018, and ending July 1, 2028, including any existing approved energy efficiency programs. In developing such portfolio of energy efficiency programs and portfolios of programs, each utility shall utilize
a stakeholder process, to be facilitated by an independent monitor compensated under the funding provided pursuant to subsection E of § 56-592.1, to provide input and feedback on (i) the development of such energy efficiency programs
and portfolios of programs; (ii) compliance with the total annual energy savings set forth in this subsection and how such savings affect utility integrated resource plans; (iii) recommended policy reforms by which the General
Assembly or the Commission can ensure maximum and cost-effective deployment of energy efficiency technology across the Commonwealth; and (iv) best practices for evaluation, measurement, and verification for the purposes of assessing
compliance with the total annual energy savings set forth in subsection B. Utilities shall utilize the services of a third party to perform evaluation, measurement, and verification services to determine a utility’s total annual
savings as required by this subsection, as well as the annual and lifecycle net and gross energy and capacity savings, related emissions reductions, and other quantifiable benefits of each program; total customer bill savings that
the programs and portfolios produce; and utility spending on each program, including any associated administrative costs. The third-party evaluator shall include and review each utility’s avoided costs and cost-benefit analyses.
The findings and reports of such third parties shall be concurrently provided to both the Commission and the utility, and the Commission shall make each such final annual report easily and publicly accessible online. Such stakeholder
process shall include the participation of representatives from each utility, relevant directors, deputy directors, and staff members of the Commission who participate in approval and oversight of utility energy efficiency savings
programs, the office of Consumer Counsel of the Attorney General, the Department of Energy, energy efficiency program implementers, energy efficiency providers, residential and small business customers, and any other interested
stakeholder whom the independent monitor deems appropriate for inclusion in such process. The independent monitor shall convene meetings of the participants in the stakeholder process not less frequently than twice in each calendar
year during the period beginning July 1, 2019, and ending July 1, 2028. The independent monitor shall report on the status of the energy efficiency stakeholder process, including (a) the objectives established by the stakeholder
group during this process related to programs to be proposed, (b) recommendations related to programs to be proposed that result from the stakeholder process, and (c) the status of those recommendations, in addition to the petitions
filed and the determination thereon, to the Governor, the Commission, and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor on July 1, 2019, and annually thereafter through
July 1, 2028.

Nothing in this section shall apply to any entity organized under Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.).

2.
For Phase II electric utilities:

a.
In calendar year 2022, at least 1.25 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019;

b.
In calendar year 2023, at least 2.5 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019;

c.
In calendar year 2024, at least 3.75 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019; and

d.
In calendar year 2025, at least 5.0 percent of the average annual energy jurisdictional retail sales by that utility in 2019; and

3.
For the time period 2026 through 2028, and for every successive three-year period thereafter, the Commission shall establish new energy efficiency savings targets. In advance of the effective date of such targets, the Commission
shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, initiate proceedings to establish such targets. As part of such proceeding, the Commission shall consider the feasibility of achieving energy efficiency goals and future energy efficiency
savings through cost-effective programs and measures. The Commission shall annually review the feasibility of the energy efficiency program savings in this section and report to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce
and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor and the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources and the Secretary of Commerce and Trade on such feasibility by October 1, 2022, and each year thereafter.

History.
2018, c. 296; 2019, cc. 397, 398; 2020, cc. 1193, 1194, 1208; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 401, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 15 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, cl. 4 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission may exclude energy jurisdictional retail sales related to zero-emission vehicles and hybrid electric vehicles from energy jurisdictional retail sales calculated pursuant
to § 56-596.2 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 397 and 398 are identical, and inserted the next to last sentence and in the last sentence, substituted “independent monitor” for “utility,” substituted “stakeholder process” for “program” and inserted “(i) the objectives established
by the stakeholder group during this process related to programs to be proposed, (ii) recommendations related to programs to be proposed that result from the stakeholder process, and (iii) the status of those recommendations, in addition
to.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and inserted subsections B and D and added the A and C designations; in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence, which read: “Each Phase I Utility and Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined
in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1, shall develop a proposed program of energy conservation measures” and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “At least five percent of such energy efficiency programs shall benefit low-income, elderly,
and disabled individuals”; in subsection C, deleted “including a margin to be recovered on operating expenses” following “efficiency programs” in the first sentence; in the second sentence, inserted “(i),” “and portfolios of programs;
(ii)” and clauses (ii) through (iv); inserted the third through the fifth sentences; in the sixth sentence, inserted “the participation of,” substituted “relevant directors, deputy directors, and staff members of the Commission who
participate in approval and oversight of utility efficiency programs,” for “the State Corporation Commission”; in the last sentence, substituted “House Committee on Labor and Commerce and Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for
“House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1208 inserted “and portfolios of programs” three times, added clauses (ii) through (iv), in the sixth sentence, inserted “the participation of” and substituted “relevant directors, deputy directors, and staff members of the Commission
who participate in approval and oversight of utility energy efficiency savings programs,” for “the State Corporation Commission”, in the last sentence, substituted “House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on
Commerce and Labor” for “House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subdivision B 3.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in subsection C.

§ 56-596.2:1.
Incentives for energy conservation measures and solar energy equipment.

Each Phase I and Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1, shall submit a petition for approval to design, implement, and operate a three-year program of energy conservation measures providing incentives to low-income,
elderly, and disabled individuals in an amount not to exceed $25 million in the aggregate for the installation of measures that reduce residential heating or cooling costs and enhance the health and safety of residents, including
repairs and improvements to home heating or cooling systems and installation of energy-saving measures in the house, such as insulation and air sealing. In developing such incentive program, each utility shall utilize the stakeholder
process set forth in § 56-596.2. The utility may provide such incentives directly to customers or to organizations that assist low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals. Such incentive program shall be deemed to be a part of
the $140 million in energy efficiency programs that a Phase I utility is required to develop pursuant to § 56-596.2 and a part of the $870 million in energy efficiency programs that a Phase II utility is required to develop pursuant
to § 56-596.2; provided that no portion of such incentive programs shall be deemed to be a part of the required five percent of such energy conservation measures set aside for low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals.

For (i) low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals or (ii) organizations providing residential services to low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals who participate in, or have already participated in, an incentive program, including the incentive
program described in subsection A, for the installation of measures that reduce heating or cooling costs at any premises where people reside, each Phase I and Phase II Utility shall submit a petition for approval to design, implement,
and operate a separate three-year incentive program, in an amount not to exceed $25 million in the aggregate, to enable the installation of, or access to, equipment to generate electric energy derived from sunlight. The utility
may provide such incentives directly to customers or to organizations that assist low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals. Such incentive program may include installation of equipment directly on the premises or access to
equipment located elsewhere, provided such installation or access reduces the total energy costs for persons described in clause (i) or (ii). Such incentive program shall not be deemed to be a part of the $140 million in energy
efficiency programs that a Phase I utility is required to develop pursuant to § 56-596.2 nor a part of the $870 million in energy efficiency programs that a Phase II utility is required to develop pursuant to § 56-596.2.

In developing such incentive programs, each utility shall give consideration to low-income, elderly, and disabled persons residing in housing that a redevelopment and housing authority owns or controls.

History.
2019, c. 748; 2020, c. 801.

Editor’s note.

Act 2019, c. 748 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 801 redesignated former subdivision A 2 as subsection B and former subsection B as subsection C; in subsection A, substituted “or cooling” for “and cooling” twice in the first sentence; in subsection B, rewrote the first sentence,
which read: “Incentives to low income, elderly, and disabled individuals, who also participate in the incentive program described above for the installation of measures that reduce residential heating and cooling costs, in an amount
not to exceed $25 million in the aggregate for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight” and added the penultimate sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 56-596.3.
Electric generation, transmission, and distribution; report.

The Commission shall submit a report and make recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly annually on or before December 1 of each year assessing (i) the reliability of electrical transmission or distribution systems; (ii) the integration
of utility or customer owned renewable electric generation resources with the utility’s electric distribution grid; (iii) the level of investment in generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity; (iv) the need for additional
generation of electricity during times of peak demand; and (v) distribution system hardening projects and enhanced physical security measures. The Commission shall submit copies of such annual reports to the Chairman of the House Committee
on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor and the Chairman of the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation.

History.
2018, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 19 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”
March 10, 2021.

§ 56-596.4.
Electric utilities; local reliability data.

For the purposes of this act, “Phase II Utility” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1.

Upon request of a locality located within the service territory of a Phase II Utility, a Phase II Utility shall provide local reliability data within 30 days of such request. The data provided to the locality shall be limited in scope to the particular
locality that made the request. Such data provided by the utility shall include standard reliability metrics used in accordance with industry-recognized electric reliability standards (IEEE 1366), including data from the System
Average Interruption Duration Index (SAIDI), the System Average Interruption Frequency Index (SAIFI), the Customer Average Interruption Duration Index (CAIDI), and the Customer Average Interruption Frequency Index (CAIFI). The
Commission shall include in the report required pursuant to § 56-596.3 such industry standard reliability metrics for each Phase II Utility and a description of any infrastructure investments made by each Phase II Utility to improve
electric service reliability over the relevant reporting period.

History.
2022, c. 653.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 436, cl. 1, was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.